Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 6. Bodyguards.

Collateral references. —

Liability of one contracting for private police or security service for acts of personnel supplied. 38 ALR3d 1332.

Regulation of private detectives, private investigators, and security agencies. 86 ALR3d 691.

Actions of security service company’s employee as rendering company liable under contract to protect persons and property. 83 ALR4th 1150.

Sec. 18.65.500.
Use of armed bodyguards.

A person who, in this state, hires another person to guard a person in this state with arms or deadly weapons, or a person who comes into this state armed with deadly weapons for the purpose of guarding a person, without a written permit from the commissioner of public safety, is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by imprisonment for not more than 60 days, or by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by both.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1976)